Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.100

Arguments—Public inspection.

(1) An argument or statement submitted to the secretary of state for publication in the voters' pamphlet is not available for public inspection or copying until:

(a) In the case of candidate statements, (i) all statements by all candidates who have filed for a particular office have been received, except those who informed the secretary that they will not submit statements, or (ii) the deadline for submission of statements has elapsed;

(b) In the case of arguments supporting or opposing a measure, (i) the arguments on both sides have been received, unless a committee was not appointed for one side, or (ii) the deadline for submission of arguments has elapsed; and

(c) In the case of rebuttal arguments, (i) the rebuttals on both sides have been received, unless a committee was not appointed for one side, or (ii) the deadline for submission of arguments has elapsed.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the secretary from releasing information under RCW 29A.32.090.

[ 2013 c 11 s 37; 2003 c 111 s 810. Prior: 1999 c 260 s 9. Formerly RCW 29.81.290.]